Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1718.01
Isolated land; changes in law; applicability.

Sections 39-1713 to 39-1719 shall not apply if public access has been granted prior to July 17, 1982.

Laws 1982, LB 239, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 10.